Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.050

Assessment roll—Entry of assessments against property.

The total assessment thus ascertained against each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in the district shall be entered upon the assessment roll as the amount to be levied and assessed against each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.050. Prior: 1957 c 144 s 19; prior: 1947 c 155 s 1, part; 1941 c 90 s 1, part; 1915 c 168 s 2, part; 1911 c 98 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9365, part.]